Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7897.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-24.1. Emergency access provisions of school safety plans.
(a) On July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, in addition to any applicable requirements of
§ 16-21-24, every public and private school, certified educational institution, college and university
located within the state that employs or enrolls twenty (20) or more staff members and students in
the aggregate, shall comply with the provisions of this section.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, every school and educational institution subject to the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall develop, maintain and annually thereafter review
and update a comprehensive school safety and emergency response plan. No later than August 1 of
each calendar year, the plan shall be submitted to the department of education with a copy to the
chief of police or the highest ranking officer of the local police department, and a copy to the
director of public safety.
(c)(1) Every comprehensive school safety and emergency response plan developed
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall include provisions ensuring immediate and
unobstructed access to all of the school's or institution's facilities to include buildings, classrooms
and grounds by law enforcement personnel and emergency medical personnel in responding to an
emergency.
(2) The provisions of subsection (c)(1) of this section may be satisfied by adopting and

implementing a plan that provides immediate access through secure electronic entry systems
through use of key fobs, card access, manual key access or other means approved pursuant to the
review required in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this section.
(d)(1) The chief of police or designee for every local police department, for every school
and institution within the jurisdiction of the police department, shall annually review the plans
submitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The chief of police may recommend to school
or institution administrators any advisable changes or amendments to the plan. If the chief of police
or chief's designee is satisfied with the provisions of the plan, the administrator of the school or
institution shall be notified that the plan is approved. Approval of the plan or recommendations for
changes or amendments shall be transmitted by the chief of police or designee to school or
institution administrators no later than August 15, annually.
(2) For every school or institution that is not located within a municipality with a local
police department, the plan shall be submitted to and reviewed by the director of public safety or
the director's designee and the director or designee shall perform all the requirements of this section
required of a local chief of police or designee.
(3) If any school or institution rejects or fails to implement any recommendation for
changes or amendments provided to an administrator pursuant to this subsection, the local chief of
police or designee shall notify the department of education of the rejection or noncompliance by
September 1 or as soon thereafter as discovered.
(e) The department of education, after consultation with the director of public safety, shall
promulgate rules and regulations to implement and enforce compliance with the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005071
========
LC005071 - Page 2 of 3